Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-509
Policies; invalid provisions; construction.

A policy issued in violation of sections 44-501 to 44-508 shall be held valid, but shall be construed as provided herein, and when any provision in such a policy is in conflict with any provision hereof, the rights, duties and obligations of the company, policyholder and the beneficiary shall be governed by the provisions of such sections.

Laws 1913, c. 154, § 107, p. 453;

R.S.1913, § 3244;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. VII, § 8, p. 634;

C.S.1922, § 7843;

C.S.1929, § 44-608;

R.S.1943, § 44-509.

Insured was entitled to statutory grace period of one month in which to pay semiannual installment of life insurance policy regardless of provisions in the policy to the contrary. Higgins v. Old Line Ins. Co., 122 Neb. 254, 240 N.W. 275 (1932).

Breach of condition in policy against removal of the insured property without the consent of the insurer was no bar to recovery where such breach did not contribute to the loss. Mayfield v. North River Ins. Co., 122 Neb. 63, 239 N.W. 197 (1931).